Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.095

Management.

The management of Washington State University and its experiment stations, the care and preservation of all property of which the institution shall become possessed, the erection and construction of all buildings necessary for the use of said university and stations, and the disbursement and expenditure of all money provided for said university, shall be vested in the board of regents, constituted as provided in RCW 28B.30.100; said regents and their successors in office shall have the right to cause all things to be done necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter or as otherwise provided by law.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.095. Prior: 1949 c 115 s 1, part; 1909 c 97 p 245 s 5, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4576, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 194, part; 1891 c 145 s 4, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.070, part, 28.80.080, part and 28.80.130, part.]